District of Columbia statutes.
25-754

Restrictions on storage of beverages.

(a)

Alcoholic beverages shall not be manufactured, kept for sale, or sold by any licensee other than at the licensed establishment; provided, that the Board may permit the storing of beverages upon premises other than the licensed establishment under the following classes of licenses:

(1)

Manufacturer’s license;

(2)

Wholesaler’s license;

(3)

Off-premises retailer’s license, class A;

(4)

Common carrier license, class C or D; and

(5)

Caterer’s license.

(b)

A licensee may not store alcoholic beverages upon premises outside the District.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 13
Aug. 24, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 8
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1394, Pub. L. 91-535, § 5
Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-27, § 2, 24 DCR 3720
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(c), 27 DCR 5117
July 26, 1986, D.C. Law 6-130, § 2, 33 DCR 3405
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 8, 34 DCR 907
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298,§ 101, 48 DCR 2959
This section is referenced in § 25-402.
1981 Ed., § 25-754.
1973 Ed., § 25-114.